District of Columbia statutes.
31-1131.10

Assumed names.

An insurance producer doing business under any name other than the producer’s legal name shall notify the Commissioner prior to using the assumed name.

History

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 10, 50 DCR 260